Wyoming, session 2026, HB0072.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 6-4-301(a)(i) and (ii) and
6-4-302(c)(i), by creating new paragraphs (iii) and (iv)
HB0072

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0027
and by creating new subsections (d) through (g) are amended
to read:

6-4-301. Definitions.

(a) As used in this article:

(i) "Disseminate" means to sell, distribute,
deliver, provide, exhibit or otherwise make available or
distribute, in any possible way or method, to another
whether in person or electronically, unless by an internet
service provider to the extent the internet service
provider is not responsible for the creation of the
material;

(ii) "Material" includes any form of human
expression or communication intended for, or capable of,
visual, auditory or sensory perception.; This includes,
without limitation:

(A) A book, leaflet, pamphlet, magazine,
picture, drawing, photograph, film, negative, slide, motion
picture, figure, object, novelty, device, recording,
HB0072

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0027
transcription, live or recorded telephone message or any
other similar item, whether tangible or intangible;

(B) A performance, exhibition, transmission
or distribution of any materials defined in subparagraph
(A) of this paragraph;

(C) A live performance or exhibition that
depicts nudity, sexual conduct, sexual excitement,
sadomasochistic behavior or abuse, as those terms are
defined in this subsection, whether to the public or an
audience of one (1) or more persons.

6-4-302. Promoting obscenity; penalties; library
materials and challenges.

(c) This section shall not apply to any person who
may produce, reproduce, possess or disseminate obscene
material:

(i) In the course of law enforcement and
judicial activities or in the course of medical or mental
health care treatment;
HB0072

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0027

(iii) If the person is a parent or guardian, and
the person is providing the obscene material to the
person's child or is permitting the child to attend an
exhibition of any obscene material if the child is
accompanied by the parent or guardian;

(iv) For health instruction and sex education
pertaining to human reproduction, venereal and other
sexually transmitted diseases, provided that written
consent by the parent or guardian is obtained before the
instruction or education begins and that the curriculum and
associated materials for instruction or education specified
in this paragraph shall be made available for inspection by
the public.

(d) A person commits the crime of promoting obscenity
to a minor if the person, knowing the character of the
material involved, knowingly:

(i) Disseminates or distributes, in any possible
way or method, to a minor material that is harmful to
minors;
HB0072

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0027

(ii) Provides, invites or promotes an event to
minors that includes material that is harmful to minors; or

(iii) Transmits or sends to a person that the
person believes is a minor by means of electronic mail,
personal messaging or any other direct internet
communication material that is harmful to minors when the
person knows or believes at the time of transmission that a
minor in this state will receive that material.

(e) Promoting obscenity to a minor is a misdemeanor
punishable by imprisonment for not more than one (1) year,
a fine of not more than six thousand dollars ($6,000.00),
or both.

(f) For purposes of subsections (d) and (g) of this
section:

(i) "Harmful to minors" means that quality of
any description, exhibition, presentation or
representation, in whatever form, of nudity, sexual
conduct, sexual excitement or sadomasochistic abuse;
HB0072

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0027

(ii) "Sexual conduct" means:

(A) Any act of sexual intercourse,
masturbation, excretory functions, lewd exhibition of the
genitals, sadomasochistic abuse or bestiality;

(B) Any other physical contact with a
person's unclothed genitals, pubic area, buttocks or female
breast, whether alone or between members of the same or
opposite sex or between a human and an animal, in an act of
sexual stimulation or attempting to sexually stimulate,
gratification or perversion;

(C) Any sexual or gender-oriented material
that knowingly exposes minors to persons who are dressed in
sexually revealing, exaggerated or provocative clothing or
costumes, or are stripping, or engaged in lewd or
lascivious dancing or movements, presentations or
activities in any place where minors are expected, invited
or are known to be present.

HB0072

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0027
(iii) "Sexual intercourse" means coitus or
copulation, whether genital-genital, oral-genital,
anal-genital or oral-anal, and whether between persons of
the same or opposite sex or between a human and an animal.

(g) No public school library or county library that
curates collections intended for minors shall curate
materials for minors that are harmful to minors as defined
by paragraph (f)(i) of this section, subject to all of the
following:

(i) A person may challenge a material as being
harmful to minors or obscene under this subsection by
filing a challenge with the library;

(ii) Not later than sixty (60) days after
receipt of the challenge, the library shall review the
challenged material to determine if the material is obscene
or harmful to minors in violation of this subsection;

(iii) If the challenged material is determined
by the library to be obscene or harmful to minors, the
library shall move the challenged material from the
HB0072

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0027
location in the library for minors to an adult section of
the library and restrict access by minors to the challenged
material, unless the minor's parent or guardian has
provided permission to the library for the minor to access
materials from the adult section of the library.

Section 2. W.S. 6-4-302(b)(ii) and (c)(ii) is
repealed.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0072